Vermont statutes. Title 16 Education
Subchapter 1. Public Schools Generally

§§ 901-905.
Repealed.
1969, No. 298 (Adj. Sess.), § 79.

§ 906.
Course of study.

In public schools, approved and recognized independent schools, and in home study programs, learning experiences shall be provided for students in the minimum course of study.

For purposes of this title, the minimum course of study means learning experiences adapted to a student’s age and ability in the fields of:

basic communication skills, including reading, writing, and the use of numbers;

citizenship, history, and government in Vermont and the United States;

physical education and comprehensive health education, including the effects of tobacco, alcoholic drinks, and drugs on the human system and on society;

English, American, and other literature;

the natural sciences; and

the fine arts.

HISTORY:

Added

1969, No. 298

(Adj. Sess.), § 65; amended

1981, No. 151

(Adj. Sess.), § 4;

1987, No. 132

(Adj. Sess.);

1987, No. 270

(Adj. Sess.), § 4, eff. Sept. 1, 1989;

1989, No. 44

, § 4, eff. June 1, 1990.

§ 907.
Lincoln’s birthday.

Exercises in commemoration of the birth, life, and services of Abraham Lincoln shall be conducted in all public and independent schools on the last school day before February 12, annually.

HISTORY:

Added

1969, No. 298

(Adj. Sess.), § 67; amended

1991, No. 24

, § 11.

§ 908.
Pre-Memorial Day exercises.

The last half-day’s session of the public schools before Memorial Day shall be devoted to exercises commemorative of the history of the nation during its wars and to patriotic instruction in the principles of liberty and the equal rights of man.

HISTORY:

Added

1969, No. 298

(Adj. Sess.), § 68.

§ 909.
Tobacco use, alcohol and drug abuse prevention education curriculum.

The Secretary, in conjunction with the Alcohol and Drug Abuse Council, and, where appropriate, with the Division of Health Promotion, shall develop a sequential alcohol and drug abuse prevention education curriculum for elementary and secondary schools. The curriculum shall include teaching about the effects and legal consequences of the possession and use of tobacco products.

The Secretary shall:

Provide for pre-service and in-service training programs for school personnel on alcohol and drug abuse prevention and on the effects and legal consequences of the possession and use of tobacco products. At least one training program shall be made available in electronic format. Each superintendent shall determine the content, duration, and frequency of training on issues concerning alcohol and drug abuse for the districts in his or her supervisory union.

Provide teaching materials that are appropriate to the age and learning ability of the students.

Provide technical assistance to the local school districts for implementation of the curriculum.

Encourage coordination of effort with existing community resources.

[Repealed.]

HISTORY:

Added

1983, No. 51

, § 3, eff. April 22, 1983; amended

1987, No. 162

(Adj. Sess.), § 1;

1995, No. 52

, § 2;

1997, No. 58

, § 11;

2007, No. 154

(Adj. Sess.), § 8;

2013, No. 92

(Adj. Sess.), § 103, eff. Feb. 14, 2014.

§ 910.
Coordination of services to children and adolescents with a severe emotional disturbance.

Each town, city, interstate, incorporated, unified, or union school district shall cooperate with the Agency of Education and the Departments of Mental Health, for Children and Families, and of Disabilities, Aging, and Independent Living when coordinating educational services to children and adolescents with a severe emotional disturbance pursuant to the provisions of 33 V.S.A. chapter 43.

HISTORY:

Added

1987, No. 264

(Adj. Sess.), § 4; amended

1989, No. 187

(Adj. Sess.), § 5;

2011, No. 58

, § 9, eff. May 31, 2011;

2013, No. 92

(Adj. Sess.), § 104, eff. Feb. 14, 2014.

§ 911.
American Sign Language; foreign language credit.

American Sign Language is a visual-gestural system of communication used by many in the Deaf community living in the United States and Canada. It is a complete and complex language that has its own syntax, rhetoric, and grammar that is used to convey information and meaning through signs made with the hands, arms, facial markers, and other body movements.

Any public or independent school may offer American Sign Language for foreign language credit.

HISTORY:

Added

2001, No. 16

, § 2.

§ 912.
Student’s right of refusal; animal dissection.

A student in a public elementary or secondary school or an approved independent school shall have the right to be excused from participating in any lesson, exercise, or assessment requiring the student to dissect, vivisect, or otherwise harm or destroy an animal or any part of an animal, or to observe any of these activities, as part of a course of instruction.

Each school district and approved independent school shall adopt and implement policies regarding a student’s right to be excused under this section, which shall include:

procedures by which the school shall provide:

timely notification to each student enrolled in the course and to the student’s parent or guardian of the student’s right to be excused from participating in or observing the lesson; and

the process by which a student may exercise this right;

alternative education methods through which a student excused under this section can learn and be assessed on material required by the course; and

a statement that no student shall be discriminated against based on his or her decision to exercise the right to be excused afforded by this section.

As used in this section, the word “animal” means any organism of the kingdom animalia and includes an animal’s cadaver or the severed parts of an animal’s cadaver.

HISTORY:

Added

2007, No. 154

(Adj. Sess.), § 4.

§ 913.
Repealed. 2013, No. 77, § 3, effective June 6, 2013.